Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1101.
do enact as follows:SB1101,11Section 1. 253.087 of the statutes is created to read:SB1101,2,22253.087 Postpartum home visits. (1) In this section:SB1101,2,33(a) “Hospital” has the meaning given in s. 50.33 (2).SB1101,2,84(b) “Postpartum home visit” means a home visit to a person who gives birth 5and their infant to support recovery from childbirth and provide postpartum 6services, including physical recovery assessment, breastfeeding and infant feeding 7support, screening for maternal emotional wellness concerns, and connection to 8appropriate follow-up care when indicated.SB1101,2,119(2) Each hospital shall provide for each person who gives birth all of the 10following services upon request by the person if the person has given birth within 11the preceding 14 days at the time of the request:SB1101,2,1312(a) Schedule a postpartum home visit for a date that is within 14 days from 13the day that the person requests the postpartum home visit.SB1101,3,314(b) Provide one postpartum home visit. The postpartum home visit may be 15provided by a doula who has received training that meets standards established by 16the Wisconsin Doulas of Color Collective, or any successor organization, a licensed 17midwife, as defined in s. 440.9805 (2), a person licensed to engage in the practice of 18nurse-midwifery under s. 441.15, or any other licensed health care provider who 19may provide the postpartum home visit consistent with the provider’s scope of 1practice. The postpartum home visit may be provided directly by the hospital or 2through referral to or coordination with an external provider authorized under this 3paragraph.SB1101,3,54(3) No hospital that provides a postpartum home visit pursuant to sub. (2) (b) 5may seek payment directly from a patient for those services.SB1101,26Section 2. 609.795 of the statutes is created to read:SB1101,3,97609.795 Postpartum home visit coverage. Defined network plans, 8preferred provider plans, and limited service health organizations are subject to s. 9632.895 (15k).SB1101,310Section 3. 632.895 (15k) of the statutes is created to read:SB1101,3,1511632.895 (15k) Postpartum home visit. Every disability insurance policy 12and self-insured health plan of the state or a county, city, village, town, or school 13district that provides maternity coverage shall provide coverage for a postpartum 14home visit for each birth as described in s. 253.087. Coverage under this subsection 15shall be provided without any cost-sharing requirement.SB1101,416Section 4. Initial applicability.SB1101,3,2017(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with s. 609.795 18or 632.895 (15k), the treatment of s. 609.795 and 632.895 (15k) first applies to 19policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection, except as 20provided in sub. (2).SB1101,4,321(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 22agreement containing provisions inconsistent with s. 609.795 or 632.895 (15k), the 23treatment of s. 609.795 and 632.895 (15k) first applies to policy or plan years 1beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day on which the 2collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, modified, or 3renewed, whichever is later.SB1101,4,44